Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5212YC (2) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 80.6, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The salaries of peace officers and employees of the 3 department and the expenses of the department shall be provided 4 for by a legislative appropriation. The compensation of peace 5 officers of the department shall be fixed according to grades 6 as to rank and length of service by the commissioner with the 7 approval of the department of administrative services, unless 8 covered by a collective bargaining agreement that provides 9 otherwise. Annual base salaries for peace officers shall be 10 as follows: 11 (1) The annual base salary for each peace officer in the 12 grade of sergeant shall be fifteen percent greater than the 13 salary of a senior trooper. 14 (2) The annual salary for each peace officer in the grade 15 of lieutenant shall be ten percent greater than the salary of 16 sergeant. 17 (3) The annual base salary of each peace officer in the 18 grade of captain or special agent in charge shall be ten 19 percent greater than the salary of lieutenant. 20 (4) The annual base salary of a major or assistant director 21 shall be ten percent greater than the salary of captain or 22 special agent in charge. 23 (5) The annual base salary of colonel or director shall be 24 fifteen percent greater than the salary of major or assistant 25 director. 26 (6) Sworn supervisors of the department shall receive 27 the same wage, step, and merit increases that are negotiated 28 under chapter 20 between the state and the state police 29 officers council labor union for peace officers subject to the 30 requirements of this section. 31